Maine, session 132, LD565.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §681, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2005, c. 647, §2 and affected
by §5, is further amended to read:
2. Homestead. "Homestead" means any residential property, including cooperative
property, in this State assessed as real property owned by an applicant or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of the applicant and occupied by the applicant as the applicant's
permanent residence or owned by a cooperative housing corporation and occupied as a
permanent residence by a resident who is a qualifying shareholder. A "homestead" does
not include any real property used solely for commercial purposes.